Hawaii statutes.
[§420D‑7] Benefit director. (a)
The board of directors of a sustainable business corporation shall include one
director who shall be designated the "benefit director" and who shall
have, in addition to all of the powers, duties, rights, and immunities of the
other directors of the sustainable business corporation, the powers, duties,
rights, and immunities provided in this section.

(b) The benefit director shall be elected
pursuant to sections 414-193 and 414-194 and may be removed in the manner provided
by sections 414-198 and 414‑199. The benefit director may serve
concurrently as the benefit officer. The articles or bylaws of a sustainable
business corporation may prescribe additional qualifications of the benefit
director; provided that the qualifications are consistent with this subsection.

(c) The benefit director shall prepare, and
the sustainable business corporation shall include in the annual benefit report
to shareholders required by section 420D-11, a statement whether, in the
opinion of the benefit director, the sustainable business corporation acted in
accordance with its general, and any specific, public benefit purpose in all
material respects during the period covered by the report and whether the
directors and officers complied with sections 420D‑6(a) and 420D‑8(a),
respectively. If in the opinion of the benefit director the sustainable
business corporation or its directors or officers failed to act according to
the requirements of this chapter, then the statement of the benefit director
shall include a description of the ways in which the sustainable business
corporation or its directors or officers failed to act according to the
requirements of this chapter. The benefit director's statement included in the
final draft of the benefit report shall include formal responses to all
questions, concerns, comments, and suggestions raised through the public
comment period required by section 420D-11.

(d) A benefit director shall be independent of
and shall have no material relationship with the sustainable business
corporation. [L 2011, c 209, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next